test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-dalla_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - dållå: # N_EVEN (with final å in nom.sg)
    dållå+N+Sg+Nom: dållå
    dållå+N+Sg+Gen: dålå
    dållå+N+Sg+Acc: dålåv
    dållå+N+Sg+Ill: dållåj
    dållå+N+Sg+Ine: dålån
    dållå+N+Sg+Ela: [dålåst, dålås]
    dållå+N+Sg+Com: [dålåjn, dålåjna]
    dållå+N+Pl+Nom: dålå
    dållå+N+Pl+Gen: dålåj
    dållå+N+Pl+Acc: dålåjd
    dållå+N+Pl+Ill: dålåjda
    dållå+N+Pl+Ine: dålåjn
    dållå+N+Pl+Ela: [dålåjst, dålåjs]
    dållå+N+Pl+Com: [dålåj, dålåjgum]
    dållå+N+Ess: dållån
    dållå+N+Abe: dålådak
